test/src/gt-norm-yamls/P-complex_kene_gt-norm.yaml
     temasugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [temasugustes, temasuguseis]
     temasugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [temasugustest, temasuguseist]
     temasugune+Pron+Pl+All: [temasugustele, temasuguseile]
     temasugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [temasugustel, temasuguseil]
     temasugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [temasugustelt, temasuguseilt]
     temasugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [temasugusteks, temasuguseiks]
     temasugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: temasugusteni
     temasugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: temasugustena
     temasugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: temasugusteta
     temasugune+Pron+Pl+Com: temasugustega
     #
     temataoline+Pron+Sg+Nom: temataoline
     temataoline+Pron+Sg+Gen: temataolise
     temataoline+Pron+Sg+Par: temataolist
     temataoline+Pron+Sg+Ill: [temataolisse, temataolisesse]
     temataoline+Pron+Sg+Ine: temataolises
     temataoline+Pron+Sg+Ela: temataolisest
     temataoline+Pron+Sg+All: temataolisele
     temataoline+Pron+Sg+Ade: temataolisel
     temataoline+Pron+Sg+Abl: temataoliselt
     temataoline+Pron+Sg+Tra: temataoliseks
     temataoline+Pron+Sg+Trm: temataoliseni
     temataoline+Pron+Sg+Ess: temataolisena
     temataoline+Pron+Sg+Abe: temataoliseta
     temataoline+Pron+Sg+Com: temataolisega
     temataoline+Pron+Pl+Nom: temataolised
     temataoline+Pron+Pl+Gen: temataoliste
     temataoline+Pron+Pl+Par: [temataolisi, temataoliseid]
     temataoline+Pron+Pl+Ill: [temataolistesse, temataolisisse]
     temataoline+Pron+Pl+Ine: [temataolistes, temataolisis]
     temataoline+Pron+Pl+Ela: [temataolistest, temataolisist]
     temataoline+Pron+Pl+All: [temataolistele, temataolisile]
     temataoline+Pron+Pl+Ade: [temataolistel, temataolisil]
     temataoline+Pron+Pl+Abl: [temataolistelt, temataolisilt]
     temataoline+Pron+Pl+Tra: [temataolisteks, temataolisiks]
     temataoline+Pron+Pl+Trm: temataolisteni
     temataoline+Pron+Pl+Ess: temataolistena
     temataoline+Pron+Pl+Abe: temataolisteta
     temataoline+Pron+Pl+Com: temataolistega
     #
     meiesugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: meiesugune
     meiesugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: meiesuguse
     meiesugune+Pron+Sg+Par: meiesugust
     meiesugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: meiesugusesse
     meiesugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: meiesuguses
     meiesugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: meiesugusest
     meiesugune+Pron+Sg+All: meiesugusele
     meiesugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: meiesugusel
     meiesugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: meiesuguselt
     meiesugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: meiesuguseks
     meiesugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: meiesuguseni
     meiesugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: meiesugusena
     meiesugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: meiesuguseta
     meiesugune+Pron+Sg+Com: meiesugusega
     meiesugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: meiesugused
     meiesugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: meiesuguste
     meiesugune+Pron+Pl+Par: meiesuguseid
     meiesugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [meiesugustesse, meiesuguseisse]
     meiesugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [meiesugustes, meiesuguseis]
     meiesugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [meiesugustest, meiesuguseist]
     meiesugune+Pron+Pl+All: [meiesugustele, meiesuguseile]
     meiesugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [meiesugustel, meiesuguseil]
     meiesugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [meiesugustelt, meiesuguseilt]
     meiesugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [meiesugusteks, meiesuguseiks]
     meiesugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: meiesugusteni
     meiesugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: meiesugustena
     meiesugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: meiesugusteta
     meiesugune+Pron+Pl+Com: meiesugustega
     #
     meietaoline+Pron+Sg+Nom: meietaoline
     meietaoline+Pron+Sg+Gen: meietaolise
     meietaoline+Pron+Sg+Par: meietaolist
     meietaoline+Pron+Sg+Ill: [meietaolisesse, meietaolisse]
     meietaoline+Pron+Sg+Ine: meietaolises
     meietaoline+Pron+Sg+Ela: meietaolisest
     meietaoline+Pron+Sg+All: meietaolisele
     meietaoline+Pron+Sg+Ade: meietaolisel
     meietaoline+Pron+Sg+Abl: meietaoliselt
     meietaoline+Pron+Sg+Tra: meietaoliseks
     meietaoline+Pron+Sg+Trm: meietaoliseni
     meietaoline+Pron+Sg+Ess: meietaolisena
     meietaoline+Pron+Sg+Abe: meietaoliseta
     meietaoline+Pron+Sg+Com: meietaolisega
     meietaoline+Pron+Pl+Nom: meietaolised
     meietaoline+Pron+Pl+Gen: meietaoliste
     meietaoline+Pron+Pl+Par: [meietaoliseid, meietaolisi]
     meietaoline+Pron+Pl+Ill: [meietaolistesse, meietaolisisse]
     meietaoline+Pron+Pl+Ine: [meietaolistes, meietaolisis]
     meietaoline+Pron+Pl+Ela: [meietaolistest, meietaolisist]
     meietaoline+Pron+Pl+All: [meietaolistele, meietaolisile]
     meietaoline+Pron+Pl+Ade: [meietaolistel, meietaolisil]
     meietaoline+Pron+Pl+Abl: [meietaolistelt, meietaolisilt]
     meietaoline+Pron+Pl+Tra: [meietaolisteks, meietaolisiks]
     meietaoline+Pron+Pl+Trm: meietaolisteni
     meietaoline+Pron+Pl+Ess: meietaolistena
     meietaoline+Pron+Pl+Abe: meietaolisteta
     meietaoline+Pron+Pl+Com: meietaolistega
     #
     nendesugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: nendesugune
     nendesugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: nendesuguse
     nendesugune+Pron+Sg+Par: nendesugust
     nendesugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: nendesugusesse
     nendesugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: nendesuguses
     nendesugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: nendesugusest
     nendesugune+Pron+Sg+All: nendesugusele
     nendesugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: nendesugusel
     nendesugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: nendesuguselt
     nendesugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: nendesuguseks
     nendesugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: nendesuguseni
     nendesugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: nendesugusena
     nendesugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: nendesuguseta
     nendesugune+Pron+Sg+Com: nendesugusega
     nendesugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: nendesugused
     nendesugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: nendesuguste
     nendesugune+Pron+Pl+Par: nendesuguseid
     nendesugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nendesugustesse, nendesuguseisse]
     nendesugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [nendesugustes, nendesuguseis]
     nendesugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [nendesugustest, nendesuguseist]
     nendesugune+Pron+Pl+All: [nendesugustele, nendesuguseile]
     nendesugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [nendesugustel, nendesuguseil]
     nendesugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [nendesugustelt, nendesuguseilt]
     nendesugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [nendesugusteks, nendesuguseiks]
     nendesugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendesugusteni
     nendesugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendesugustena
     nendesugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendesugusteta
     nendesugune+Pron+Pl+Com: nendesugustega
     #
     nendetaoline+Pron+Sg+Nom: nendetaoline
     nendetaoline+Pron+Sg+Gen: nendetaolise
     nendetaoline+Pron+Sg+Par: nendetaolist
     nendetaoline+Pron+Sg+Ill: [nendetaolisse, nendetaolisesse]
     nendetaoline+Pron+Sg+Ine: nendetaolises
     nendetaoline+Pron+Sg+Ela: nendetaolisest
     nendetaoline+Pron+Sg+All: nendetaolisele
     nendetaoline+Pron+Sg+Ade: nendetaolisel
     nendetaoline+Pron+Sg+Abl: nendetaoliselt
     nendetaoline+Pron+Sg+Tra: nendetaoliseks
     nendetaoline+Pron+Sg+Trm: nendetaoliseni
     nendetaoline+Pron+Sg+Ess: nendetaolisena
     nendetaoline+Pron+Sg+Abe: nendetaoliseta
     nendetaoline+Pron+Sg+Com: nendetaolisega
     nendetaoline+Pron+Pl+Nom: nendetaolised
     nendetaoline+Pron+Pl+Gen: nendetaoliste
     nendetaoline+Pron+Pl+Par: [nendetaolisi, nendetaoliseid]
     nendetaoline+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nendetaolistesse, nendetaolisisse]
     nendetaoline+Pron+Pl+Ine: [nendetaolistes, nendetaolisis]
     nendetaoline+Pron+Pl+Ela: [nendetaolistest, nendetaolisist]
     nendetaoline+Pron+Pl+All: [nendetaolistele, nendetaolisile]
     nendetaoline+Pron+Pl+Ade: [nendetaolistel, nendetaolisil]
     nendetaoline+Pron+Pl+Abl: [nendetaolistelt, nendetaolisilt]
     nendetaoline+Pron+Pl+Tra: [nendetaolisteks, nendetaolisiks]
     nendetaoline+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendetaolisteni
     nendetaoline+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendetaolistena
     nendetaoline+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendetaolisteta
     nendetaoline+Pron+Pl+Com: nendetaolistega
     #
     seesugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: seesugune
     seesugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: seesuguse
     seesugune+Pron+Sg+Par: seesugust
     seesugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: seesugusesse
     seesugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: seesuguses
     seesugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: seesugusest
     seesugune+Pron+Sg+All: seesugusele
     seesugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: seesugusel
     seesugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: seesuguselt
     seesugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: seesuguseks
     seesugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: seesuguseni
     seesugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: seesugusena
     seesugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: seesuguseta
     seesugune+Pron+Sg+Com: seesugusega
     seesugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: seesugused
     seesugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: seesuguste
     seesugune+Pron+Pl+Par: seesuguseid
     seesugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [seesugustesse, seesuguseisse]
     seesugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [seesugustes, seesuguseis]
     seesugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [seesugustest, seesuguseist]
     seesugune+Pron+Pl+All: [seesugustele, seesuguseile]
     seesugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [seesugustel, seesuguseil]
     seesugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [seesugustelt, seesuguseilt]
     seesugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [seesugusteks, seesuguseiks]
     seesugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: seesugusteni
     seesugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: seesugustena
     seesugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: seesugusteta
     seesugune+Pron+Pl+Com: seesugustega
     #
     selletaoline+Pron+Sg+Nom: selletaoline
     selletaoline+Pron+Sg+Gen: selletaolise
     selletaoline+Pron+Sg+Par: selletaolist
     selletaoline+Pron+Sg+Ill: [selletaolisesse, selletaolisse]
     selletaoline+Pron+Sg+Ine: selletaolises
     selletaoline+Pron+Sg+Ela: selletaolisest
     selletaoline+Pron+Sg+All: selletaolisele
     selletaoline+Pron+Sg+Ade: selletaolisel
     selletaoline+Pron+Sg+Abl: selletaoliselt
     selletaoline+Pron+Sg+Tra: selletaoliseks
     selletaoline+Pron+Sg+Trm: selletaoliseni
     selletaoline+Pron+Sg+Ess: selletaolisena
     selletaoline+Pron+Sg+Abe: selletaoliseta
     selletaoline+Pron+Sg+Com: selletaolisega
     selletaoline+Pron+Pl+Nom: selletaolised
     selletaoline+Pron+Pl+Gen: selletaoliste
     selletaoline+Pron+Pl+Par: [selletaoliseid, selletaolisi]
     selletaoline+Pron+Pl+Ill: [selletaolistesse, selletaolisisse]
     selletaoline+Pron+Pl+Ine: [selletaolistes, selletaolisis]
     selletaoline+Pron+Pl+Ela: [selletaolistest, selletaolisist]
     selletaoline+Pron+Pl+All: [selletaolistele, selletaolisile]
     selletaoline+Pron+Pl+Ade: [selletaolistel, selletaolisil]
     selletaoline+Pron+Pl+Abl: [selletaolistelt, selletaolisilt]
     selletaoline+Pron+Pl+Tra: [selletaolisteks, selletaolisiks]
     selletaoline+Pron+Pl+Trm: selletaolisteni
     selletaoline+Pron+Pl+Ess: selletaolistena
     selletaoline+Pron+Pl+Abe: selletaolisteta
     selletaoline+Pron+Pl+Com: selletaolistega
     #
     isesugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: isesugune
     isesugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: isesuguse
     isesugune+Pron+Sg+Par: isesugust
     isesugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: isesugusesse
     isesugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: isesuguses
     isesugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: isesugusest
     isesugune+Pron+Sg+All: isesugusele
     isesugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: isesugusel
     isesugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: isesuguselt
     isesugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: isesuguseks
     isesugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: isesuguseni
     isesugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: isesugusena
     isesugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: isesuguseta
     isesugune+Pron+Sg+Com: isesugusega
     isesugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: isesugused
     isesugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: isesuguste
     isesugune+Pron+Pl+Par: isesuguseid
     isesugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [isesugustesse, isesuguseisse]
     isesugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [isesugustes, isesuguseis]
     isesugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [isesugustest, isesuguseist]
     isesugune+Pron+Pl+All: [isesugustele, isesuguseile]
     isesugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [isesugustel, isesuguseil]
     isesugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [isesugustelt, isesuguseilt]
     isesugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [isesugusteks, isesuguseiks]
     isesugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: isesugusteni
     isesugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: isesugustena
     isesugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: isesugusteta
     isesugune+Pron+Pl+Com: isesugustega
     #
     missugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: missugune
     missugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: missuguse
     missugune+Pron+Sg+Par: missugust
     missugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: missugusesse
     missugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: missuguses
     missugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: missugusest
     missugune+Pron+Sg+All: missugusele
     missugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: missugusel
     missugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: missuguselt
     missugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: missuguseks
     missugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: missuguseni
     missugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: missugusena
     missugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: missuguseta
     missugune+Pron+Sg+Com: missugusega
     missugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: missugused
     missugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: missuguste
